Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 1. Miscellaneous Common Law Rules Abolished.

Sec. 34.27.010.
Rules against perpetuities modified. [Repealed, § 2 ch 82 SLA 1994. For comparable provisions, see AS 34.27.051 — 34.27.100.]

Sec. 34.27.020.
Abolition of the common law rule in Shelley’s case.

If real property is granted or devised to a person and after the person’s death, to the person’s heirs or the heirs of the person’s body, however the grant or devise is expressed, an estate for life only vests in the person, and a remainder goes to the person’s heirs or the heirs of the person’s body as purchasers.

History.

(§ 2 ch 51 SLA 1983)

Sec. 34.27.030.
Abolition of the common law destructibility of contingent remainders.

A contingent remainder is not defeated by the termination of a precedent estate before the occurrence of the contingency that was to cause the remainder to take effect. If the contingency occurs later, the remainder takes effect in the same way as a springing or shifting executory interest.

History.

(§ 2 ch 51 SLA 1983)